Florida, session 2026, SB1502.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âPresent subsections (1) through (10) of section 19 215.5586, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsection (2) 20 through (11), respectively, a new subsection (1) is added to 21 that section, and present subsections (1), (2), and (10) of that 22 section are amended, to read: 23 215.5586âMy Safe Florida Home Program.âThere is established 24 within the Department of Financial Services the My Safe Florida 25 Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal 26 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership 27 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does 28 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the 29 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of 30 residential property in this state. Implementation of this 31 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is 32 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability 33 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed 34 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of 35 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects 36 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in 37 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by 38 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other 39 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of 40 available funds. If, after applications are processed and 41 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept 42 applications up to the available amount. The program shall 43 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach 44 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements 45 provided in this section. 46 (1)âDEFINITION.âAs used in this section, the term âclass A 47 opening protectionâ means all glazed openings are large missile 48 impact-rated, or protected by products that qualify as such, 49 and: 50 (a)âAll openings are protected at the highest applicable 51 level; 52 (b)âSolid entry doors and garage doors are verified to be 53 wind and pressure rated; or 54 (c)âSolid entry doors and garage doors cannot be identified 55 to be wind and pressure rated. 56 (2)(1)âHURRICANE MITIGATION INSPECTIONS.â 57 (a)âTo be eligible for a hurricane mitigation inspection 58 under the program: 59 1.âA home must be a single-family, detached residential 60 property or a townhouse as defined in s. 481.203; 61 2.âA home must be site-built and owner-occupied; and 62 3.âThe homeowner must have been granted a homestead 63 exemption on the home under chapter 196. 64 (b)1.âAn application for a hurricane mitigation inspection 65 must contain a signed or electronically verified statement made 66 under penalty of perjury that the applicant has submitted only 67 one inspection application on the home or that the application 68 is allowed under subparagraph 2., and the application must have 69 documents attached which demonstrate that the applicant meets 70 the requirements of paragraph (a). 71 2.âAn applicant may submit a subsequent hurricane 72 mitigation inspection application for the same home only if: 73 a.âThe original hurricane mitigation inspection application 74 has been denied or withdrawn because of errors or omissions in 75 the application; 76 b.âThe original hurricane mitigation inspection application 77 was denied or withdrawn because the home did not meet the 78 eligibility criteria for an inspection at the time of the 79 previous application, and the homeowner reasonably believes the 80 home now is eligible for an inspection; or 81 c.âThe programâs eligibility requirements for an inspection 82 have changed since the original application date, and the 83 applicant reasonably believes the home is eligible under the new 84 requirements. 85 (c)âAn applicant meeting the requirements of paragraph (a) 86 may receive an inspection of a home under the program without 87 being eligible for a grant under subsection (3) (2) or applying 88 for such grant. 89 (d)âLicensed inspectors are to provide home inspections of 90 eligible homes to determine what mitigation measures are needed, 91 what insurance premium discounts may be available, and what 92 improvements to an existing residential property properties are 93 needed to reduce the propertyâs vulnerability to hurricane 94 damage. An inspector may inspect a townhouse as defined in s. 95 481.203 to determine whether if opening protection mitigation as 96 listed in subparagraph (3)(e)1. or subparagraph (3)(e)3. 97 (2)(e)1. would provide improvements to mitigate hurricane 98 damage. 99 (e)âThe department shall contract with wind certification 100 entities to provide hurricane mitigation inspections and verify 101 all current mitigation features. The inspections provided to 102 homeowners, at a minimum, must include: 103 1.âA home inspection and report that: 104 a.âSummarizes the results and identifies recommended 105 improvements a homeowner may take to mitigate hurricane damage. 106 b.âCompletes a uniform mitigation verification inspection 107 form, created by the department by rule. 108 c.âCertifies, under penalty of perjury, that the 109 recommended improvements materially increase the wind resistance 110 level of the home. 111 2.âA range of cost estimates regarding the recommended 112 mitigation improvements. 113 3.âInformation regarding estimated premium discounts, 114 correlated to the current mitigation features and the 115 recommended mitigation improvements identified by the 116 inspection. 117 (f)âTo qualify for selection by the department as a wind 118 certification entity to provide hurricane mitigation 119 inspections, the entity must, at a minimum, meet the following 120 requirements: 121 1.âUse hurricane mitigation inspectors who are licensed or 122 certified as: 123 a.âA building inspector under s. 468.607; 124 b.âA general, building, or residential contractor under s. 125 489.111; 126 c.âA professional engineer under s. 471.015; 127 d.âA professional architect under s. 481.213; or 128 e.âA home inspector under s. 468.8314 and who have 129 completed at least 3 hours of hurricane mitigation training 130 approved by the Construction Industry Licensing Board, which 131 training must include hurricane mitigation techniques, 132 compliance with the uniform mitigation verification form, and 133 completion of a proficiency exam. 134 2.âUse hurricane mitigation inspectors who also have 135 undergone drug testing and a background screening. The 136 department may conduct criminal record checks of inspectors used 137 by wind certification entities. Inspectors must submit a set of 138 fingerprints to the department for state and national criminal 139 history checks and must pay the fingerprint processing fee set 140 forth in s. 624.501. The fingerprints must be sent by the 141 department to the Department of Law Enforcement and forwarded to 142 the Federal Bureau of Investigation for processing. The results 143 must be returned to the department for screening. The 144 fingerprints must be taken by a law enforcement agency, 145 designated examination center, or other department-approved 146 entity. 147 3.âProvide a quality assurance program including a 148 reinspection component. 149 (3)(2)âHURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.âFinancial grants must 150 shall be used by homeowners to make improvements recommended by 151 an inspection which increase resistance to hurricane damage. 152 (a)âA homeowner is eligible for a hurricane mitigation 153 grant if all of the following criteria are met: 154 1.âThe home must be eligible for an inspection under 155 subsection (2) (1). 156 2.âThe home must be a dwelling with an insured value of 157 $700,000 or less. Homeowners who are low-income persons, as 158 defined in s. 420.0004(11), are exempt from this requirement. 159 3.âThe home must undergo an acceptable hurricane mitigation 160 inspection as provided in subsection (2) (1). 161 4.âThe building permit application for initial construction 162 of the home must have been made before January 1, 2008. 163 5.âThe homeowner must agree to make his or her home 164 available for inspection once a mitigation project is completed. 165 6.âThe homeowner must agree to provide to the department 166 information received from the homeownerâs insurer identifying 167 the discounts realized by the homeowner because of the 168 mitigation improvements funded through the program. 169 7.a.âThe homeowner must be a low-income person or moderate 170 income person as defined in s. 420.0004. 171 b.âThe hurricane mitigation inspection must have occurred 172 within the previous 24 months from the date of application. 173 c.âNotwithstanding subparagraph 2., homeowners who are low 174 income persons, as defined in s. 420.0004(11), are not exempt 175 from the requirement that the home must be a dwelling with an 176 insured value of $700,000 or less. 177 d.âThis subparagraph expires July 1, 2026. 178 8.âThe home does not have class A opening protection or 179 equivalent mitigation features. 180 9.âThe grant must result in all exterior openings and roof 181 to-wall connections meeting the highest applicable wind-borne 182 debris region standards, except that a solid exterior door 183 without glass located in a county other than Monroe County, 184 Miami-Dade County, or Broward County does not need to be impact 185 rated. 186 10.âThe grant will not be used to replace opening 187 protections that currently meet the highest applicable wind 188 protection rating. 189 (b)1.âAn application for a grant must contain a signed or 190 electronically verified statement made under penalty of perjury 191 that the applicant has submitted only one grant application or 192 that the application is allowed under subparagraph 2., and the 193 application must have documents attached demonstrating that the 194 applicant meets the requirements of paragraph (a). 195 2.âAn applicant may submit a subsequent grant application 196 if: 197 a.âThe original grant application was denied or withdrawn 198 because the application contained errors or omissions; 199 b.âThe original grant application was denied or withdrawn 200 because the home did not meet the eligibility criteria for a 201 grant at the time of the previous application, and the homeowner 202 reasonably believes that the home now is eligible for a grant; 203 or 204 c.âThe programâs eligibility requirements for a grant have 205 changed since the original application date, and the applicant 206 reasonably believes that he or she is an eligible homeowner 207 under the new requirements. 208 3.âA grant application must include a statement from the 209 homeowner which contains the name and state license number of 210 the contractor that the homeowner acknowledges as the intended 211 contractor for the mitigation work. The program must 212 electronically verify that the contractorâs state license number 213 is accurate and up to date before grant approval. 214 (c)âAll grants must be matched on the basis of $1 provided 215 by the applicant for $2 provided by the state up to a maximum 216 state contribution of $10,000 toward the actual cost of the 217 mitigation project, except as provided in paragraph (g) (h). 218 (d)âAll hurricane mitigation performed under the program 219 must be based upon the securing of all required local permits 220 and inspections and must be performed by properly licensed 221 contractors. 222 (e)âWhen recommended by a hurricane mitigation inspection, 223 grants for eligible homes may be used for the following 224 improvements: 225 1.âImpact-rated opening protection, including exterior 226 doors, garage doors, windows, and doors skylights. 227 2.âApproved Reinforcing roof-to-wall connections. 228 3.âHurricane shutters that meet Florida Building Code 229 Standards 230 3.âImproving the strength of roof-deck attachments. 231 4.âRoof replacement, if the current Secondary water 232 resistance for roof does not meet the standards of the Florida 233 Building Code. 234 (f)âWhen recommended by a hurricane mitigation inspection, 235 grants for townhouses, as defined in s. 481.203, may only be 236 used for opening protection. 237 (f)(g)âThe department may require that improvements be made 238 to all openings, including exterior doors, garage doors, 239 windows, and skylights, as a condition of reimbursing a 240 homeowner approved for a grant. The department may adopt, by 241 rule, the maximum grant allowances for any improvement allowable 242 under paragraph (e) or paragraph (f). 243 (g)(h)âLow-income homeowners, as defined in s. 244 420.0004(11), who otherwise meet the applicable requirements of 245 this subsection are eligible for a grant of up to $10,000 and 246 are not required to provide a matching amount to receive the 247 grant. 248 (h)(i)1.âThe department shall develop a process that 249 ensures the most efficient means to collect and verify 250 inspection applications and grant applications to determine 251 eligibility. The department may direct hurricane mitigation 252 inspectors to collect and verify grant application information 253 or use the Internet or other electronic means to collect 254 information and determine eligibility. 255 2.âThe department shall prioritize the review and approval 256 of such inspection applications and grant applications in the 257 following order: 258 a.âFirst, applications from low-income persons, as defined 259 in s. 420.0004, who are at least 60 years old; 260 b.âSecond, applications from all other low-income persons, 261 as defined in s. 420.0004; 262 c.âThird, applications from moderate-income persons, as 263 defined in s. 420.0004, who are at least 60 years old; 264 d.âFourth, applications from all other moderate-income 265 persons, as defined in s. 420.0004; and 266 e.âLast, all other applications. 267 3.âThe department shall start accepting inspection 268 applications and grant applications no earlier than the 269 effective date of a legislative appropriation funding 270 inspections and grants, as follows: 271 a.âInitially, from applicants prioritized under sub 272 subparagraph 2.a.; 273 b.âFrom applicants prioritized under sub-subparagraph 2.b., 274 beginning 15 days after the program initially starts accepting 275 applications; 276 c.âFrom applicants prioritized under sub-subparagraph 2.c., 277 beginning 30 days after the program initially starts accepting 278 applications; 279 d.âFrom applicants described in sub-subparagraph 2.d., 280 beginning 45 days after the program initially starts accepting 281 applications; and 282 e.âFrom all other applicants, beginning 60 days after the 283 program initially starts accepting applications. 284 4.âThe program may accept a certification directly from a 285 low-income homeowner or moderate-income homeowner who meets the 286 requirements of s. 420.0004(11) or (12), respectively, if the 287 homeowner provides such certification in a signed or 288 electronically verified statement made under penalty of perjury. 289 (i)(j)âA homeowner who receives a grant shall finalize 290 construction and request a final inspection, or request an 291 extension for an additional 6 months, within 1 year after grant 292 approval. If a homeowner fails to comply with this paragraph, 293 his or her application is deemed abandoned and the grant money 294 reverts to the department. 295 (11)(10)âREPORTS AND ACCOUNTABILITY.â 296 (a)âThe department shall make an annual report on the 297 activities of the program that shall account for the use of 298 state funds and indicate the number of inspections requested, 299 the number of inspections performed, the number of grant 300 applications received, the number and value of grants approved, 301 and the estimated average annual amount of insurance premium 302 discounts and total estimated annual amount of insurance premium 303 discounts homeowners received from insurers as a result of 304 mitigation funded through the program. The report must detail 305 the percentage of grants used for each type of improvement 306 listed under paragraph (2)(e) and the corresponding average 307 premium reduction from such improvements. The report must be 308 delivered to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 309 House of Representatives by February 1 of each year. 310 (b)âThe department shall maintain a publicly accessible 311 online dashboard that shows the total funds awarded by the 312 program, categorized by the type of improvement the funds were 313 used for, and the percentage of homes achieving reductions in 314 insurance premiums. 315 (c)âThe department shall establish performance standards 316 and audit protocols for inspectors under paragraph (2)(d) which 317 ensure accuracy and compliance with this section. 318 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.